Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-476.01
Revocation of operator's license, defined.

Revocation of operator's license shall mean the termination by a court of competent jurisdiction or by formal action of the Department of Motor Vehicles of a person's operator's license, which termination shall not be subject to renewal or restoration. Application for reinstatement of eligibility for a new license may be presented and acted upon by the department after the expiration of the applicable period of time prescribed in the statute providing for revocation.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 70;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 8.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, a motorist's ineligibility to hold a driver's license in another state constitutes a revocation as it is defined by this section. Wilczewski v. Neth, 273 Neb. 324, 729 N.W.2d 678 (2007).